Idaho, session 2025, S1121.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 31-2808, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-2808. MAKING FINAL DISPOSITION OF DEAD HUMAN BODIES PROHIBITED. No
coroner or person acting as coroner who is a licensed funeral director or
a licensed mortician, owner, or proprietor, or employee of any establish-
ment engaged in making final disposition of dead human bodies, and no estab-
lishment with which such coroner or person acting as coroner is associated,
shall, except for ambulance services, perform any of the services of a fu-
neral director or mortician or furnish any materials connected with or in-
cidental to the final disposition of the body of any person whose death is
required by law to be investigated by such coroner or other person acting in
that capacity. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a mis-
demeanor. Provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not
be applicable in counties wherein there is only one (1) licensed funeral es-
tablishment or in counties with a population of fewer than twenty thousand
(20,000) people according to the most recent federal census.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.